Arkansas, session 2025, HB1301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1103, concerning the definitions used
in the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(23) "Gold card program" means the process described in §§ 23-
99-1120 — 23-99-1126 under which a healthcare provider may qualify for an
exemption from a healthcare insurer's or pharmacy benefits manager's prior
authorization requirements.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1120 is amended to read as follows:

23-99-1120. Initial exemption from prior authorization requirements
for healthcare providers providing certain healthcare services.
(a)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section,
beginning on and after January 1, 2024, a healthcare provider that received
approval for ninety percent (90%) or more of the healthcare provider's prior
authorization requests based on a review of the healthcare provider's
utilization of the particular healthcare services from January 1, 2022,
through June 30, 2022, shall not be required to obtain prior authorization
*ANS112*
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
for a particular healthcare service and shall be considered exempt from prior
authorization requirements through September 30, 2024.
(2) If a healthcare provider's use for a particular healthcare
service increases by twenty-five percent (25%) or more during the period
between January 1, 2024, and June 30, 2024, based on a review of the
healthcare provider's utilization of the particular healthcare service from
January 1, 2022, through June 30, 2022, then the healthcare insurer may
disallow the exemption from prior authorization requirements for the
healthcare provider for the particular healthcare service.
(b)(1) A healthcare insurer shall conduct an evaluation of the initial
six-month exemption period based on claims submitted between January 1, 2024,
through June 30, 2024, to determine whether to grant or deny an exemption for
each particular healthcare service that requires a prior authorization by the
healthcare insurer.
(2) The evaluation by the healthcare insurer shall be conducted
by using the retrospective review process under § 23-99-1122(c) and applying
the criteria under subsection (d) of this section.
(3) A healthcare insurer shall submit to a healthcare provider a
written statement of:
(A) The total number of payable claims submitted by or in
connection with the healthcare provider; and
(B) The total number of denied and approved prior
authorizations between January 1, 2022, through June 30, 2022.
(c)(1) No later than October 1, 2024, a healthcare insurer shall issue
a notice to each healthcare provider that either grants or denies a prior
authorization exemption to the healthcare provider for each particular
healthcare service.
(2) An exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(1) shall be
valid for at least twelve (12) months.
(d) Except as provided under subsection (f) subsection (c) of this
section or § 23-99-1125, a healthcare insurer that uses a prior authorization
process for healthcare services shall not require a healthcare provider to
obtain prior authorization for a particular healthcare service that a
healthcare provider has previously been subject to a prior authorization
requirement if, in the most recent six-month evaluation period as described
under subsection (e) subsection (b) of this section, the healthcare insurer
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
has approved or would have approved no less than ninety percent (90%) of the
prior authorization requests submitted by the healthcare provider for that
particular healthcare service.
(e)(1)(b)(1) Except as provided under subsection (f) subsection (c) of
this section, a healthcare insurer shall evaluate whether or not a healthcare
provider qualifies for an exemption from prior authorization requirements
under subsection (d) subsection (a) of this section one (1) time every twelve
(12) months.
(2) The six-month period for the evaluation period described
under subsection (d) subsection (a) of this section shall be:
(A) For a healthcare provider with an existing exemption
under this section, any consecutive six-month period during the twelve (12)
months following the effective date of the exemption;
(B) For an initial healthcare provider, any consecutive
six-month period during the twelve (12) months following the healthcare
provider's first filed claim with the healthcare insurer;
(C) For an initial healthcare insurer, any consecutive
six-month period during the twelve (12) months following the healthcare
insurer's commencement of operations subject to this subchapter; or
(D)(i) For a healthcare provider denied an exemption under
this section, any consecutive six-month period during the twelve (12) months
before the healthcare provider's request for a new evaluation.
(ii) A healthcare provider may request that the
healthcare insurer perform a new evaluation twelve (12) months after the most
recent denial.
(3) The healthcare insurer shall choose a six-month evaluation
period that allows time for:
(A) The evaluation under subsection (d) subsection (a) of
this section;
(B) Notice to the healthcare provider of the decision; and
(C) Appeal of the decision for an independent review to be
completed by the end of the twelve-month period of the exemption.
(f)(c) A healthcare insurer may continue an exemption under subsection
(d) subsection (a) of this section without evaluating whether or not the
healthcare provider qualifies for the exemption under subsection (d)
subsection (a) of this section for a particular evaluation period.
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
(g)(d) A healthcare provider is not required to request an exemption
under subsection (d) subsection (a) of this section to quality qualify for
the exemption.
(h)(e)(1) A healthcare insurer may shall extend an exemption under
subsection (d) subsection (a) of this section to a group of healthcare
providers under the same tax identification number if either the healthcare
insurer or the healthcare provider elects to do so, and:
(1)(A) A healthcare provider with an ownership interest in
the entity to which the tax identification number is assigned does not
object; or
(2)(B) The tax identification number is associated with a
hospital licensed in this state and the chief executive officer of the
hospital agrees to the exemption.
(2) If a healthcare insurer elects to extend an exemption under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section to a group of healthcare providers, the
healthcare insurer shall provide to each affected healthcare provider at
least sixty (60) days' prior notice of the election and of any modification
to or termination of the election.
(3) If, in the most recent six-month evaluation period, the
healthcare insurer approved or would have approved less than eighty percent
(80%) of the prior authorization requests submitted by a healthcare provider
for a particular healthcare service, the healthcare provider shall not be
eligible for inclusion under an exemption extended to healthcare providers
under the same tax identification number under this subsection.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1121(a), concerning the duration of a
prior authorization exemption under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) Unless a prior authorization exemption is continued for a longer
period of time by a healthcare insurer under § 23-99-1120(f) § 23-99-1120(c),
a healthcare provider's exemption from prior authorization requirements under
§ 23-99-1120 remains in effect until the later of:
(1) The thirtieth day after the date the healthcare insurer
notifies the healthcare provider of the healthcare insurer's determination to
rescind the exemption as described under § 23-99-1122, if the healthcare
provider does not appeal the healthcare insurer's determination within thirty
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
(30) days of notification of the determination;
(2) If the healthcare provider appeals the determination within
thirty (30) days of notification of the determination, the fifth day after
the date an independent review organization affirms the healthcare insurer's
determination to rescind the exemption; or
(3) Twelve (12) months after the effective date of the
exemption.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1122(a), concerning the recission of
a prior authorization exemption under the Prior Authorization Transparency
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A healthcare insurer may rescind an exemption from prior
authorization requirements of a healthcare provider under § 23-99-1120 only
if:
(1) The healthcare insurer makes a determination that, on the
basis of a retrospective review of a random sample of claims selected by the
healthcare insurer during the most recent evaluation period described by §
23-99-1120(e) § 23-99-1120(b), less than ninety percent (90%) of the claims
for the particular healthcare service met the medical necessity criteria that
would have been used by the healthcare insurer when conducting prior
authorization review for the particular healthcare service during the
relevant evaluation period;
(2) The healthcare insurer complies with other applicable
requirements specified in this section, including without limitation:
(A) Notifying the healthcare provider no less than twenty-
five (25) thirty (30) days before the proposed rescission is to take effect;
and
(B) Providing:
(i) An identification of the healthcare service that
an exemption is being rescinded, the date the notice is issued, and the
effective date of the rescission;
(ii) A plain-language explanation of how the
healthcare provider may appeal and seek an independent review of the
determination, the date the notice is issued, and the company's address and
contact information for returning the form by mail or email to request an
appeal;
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
(iii) A statement of the total number of payable
claims submitted by or in connection with the healthcare provider during the
most recent evaluation period that were eligible to be evaluated with respect
to the healthcare service subject to rescission, the number of claims
included in the random sample, and the sample information used to make the
determination, including without limitation:
(a) Identification of each claim included in
the random sample;
(b) The healthcare insurer's determination of
whether each claim met the healthcare insurer's screening criteria; and
(c) For any claim determined to not have met
the healthcare insurer's screening criteria:
(1) The principal reasons for the
determination that the claim did not meet the healthcare insurer's screening
criteria, including, if applicable, a statement that the determination was
based on a failure to submit specified medical records;
(2) The clinical basis for the
determination that the claim did not meet the healthcare insurer's screening
criteria;
(3) A description of the sources of the
screening criteria that were used as guidelines in making the determination;
and
(4) The professional specialty of the
healthcare provider who made the determination;
(iv) A space to be filled out by the healthcare
provider that includes:
(a) The name, address, contact information,
and identification number of the healthcare provider requesting an
independent review;
(b) An indication of whether or not the
healthcare provider is requesting that the entity performing the independent
review examine the same random sample or a different random sample of claims,
if available; and
(c) The date the appeal is being requested;
and
(v) An instruction to the healthcare provider to
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
return the form to the healthcare insurer before the date the rescission
becomes effective; and
(3) The healthcare provider performs five (5) or fewer of
a particular healthcare service in the most recent six-month evaluation
period under § 23-99-1120(e) § 23-99-1120(b).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1122(c)(2), concerning the timeline a
healthcare insurer provides to a healthcare provider to provide medical
records under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) A healthcare insurer shall provide a healthcare provider at
least thirty (30) sixty (60) days to provide the medical records requested
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1126(a), concerning the payments to a
healthcare provider who has an exemption under the Prior Authorization
Transparency Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A healthcare insurer shall not deny or reduce payment to a
healthcare provider for a healthcare service for which the healthcare
provider has qualified for an exemption from prior authorization requirements
under § 23-99-1120, including a healthcare service performed or supervised by
another healthcare provider, if the healthcare provider who ordered the
healthcare service received a prior authorization exemption based on medical
necessity or appropriateness of care unless the healthcare provider:
(1)(A) Knowingly and materially misrepresented the
healthcare service in a request for payment submitted to the healthcare
insurer with the specific intent to deceive the healthcare insurer and obtain
an unlawful payment from the healthcare insurer; or
(2)(B) Substantially failed to perform the healthcare
service.
(2)(A) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not constitute a
basis for a healthcare insurer to:
(i) Request information from a healthcare provider;
or
(ii) Delay reimbursement in order to obtain
information.
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
(B) A request for information under subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(i) of this section shall comply with applicable laws and rules.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1126(d), concerning the information
required in the notice to a healthcare provider under the Prior Authorization
Transparency Act, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Beginning on January 1, 2024, a A healthcare insurer shall provide
to a healthcare provider a notice that includes a:
(1) Statement that the healthcare provider has an exemption from
prior authorization requirements under § 23-99-1120;
(2) List of the healthcare services and health benefit plans to
which the exemption applies; and
(3) Statement of the duration of the exemption.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1127 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1127. Applicability.
(a)(1) An organization or entity directly or indirectly providing a
plan or services to patients under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care
Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq., or any other Medicaid-managed care program
operating in this state is exempt from §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126 if the
program, without limiting the program's application to any other plan or
program, develops and conforms to a program to reduce or eliminate prior
authorizations for a healthcare provider on or before January 1, 2025.
(2) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq., or its successor program is exempt from §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-
99-1126, provided that the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program,
without limiting the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program's
application to any other plan or program, develops and conforms to a program
to reduce or eliminate prior authorizations for a healthcare provider on or
before January 1, 2025.
(3) A qualified health plan that is a health benefit plan under
the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, and
purchased on the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace created under the
Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., for an
individual up to four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty level,
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
operating in this state is exempt from §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126 if the
qualified health plan, without limiting the program's application to any
other plan or program, develops and conforms to a program to reduce or
eliminate prior authorizations for a healthcare provider on or before January
1, 2025.
(b)(1)(A) The programs At least one (1) time every two (2) years, a
program under subsection (a) of this section to reduce or eliminate prior
authorization shall be:
(A)(i) Submitted to the State Insurance Department;
and
(B)(ii) Subject to approval by the Legislative
Council.
(B) A program under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(i) Data, statistics, and other appropriate
documentation demonstrating the effectiveness of the previously submitted
program in reducing or eliminating prior authorizations for a healthcare
provider; and
(ii) For a program that does not eliminate prior
authorizations for a healthcare provider, specific initiatives or elements of
the program that reduce existing prior authorizations for a healthcare
provider.
(C)(i) Upon submitting the program under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the submitting entity shall provide notice to each
healthcare provider that includes:
(a) The complete program submission;
(b) The deadline for a healthcare provider to
comment on the program submission; and
(c) Instructions on how a healthcare provider
may comment on the program.
(ii) A healthcare provider shall have at least
thirty (30) days to comment on a program submitted under subdivision (b)(1)
of this section.
(2) If a program is not submitted to the department and approved
by the Legislative Council on or before January 1, 2025 as required or does
not conform to the requirements of this section, the Medicaid-managed care
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
program operating in this state, the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., or its successor program, and qualified health
plans under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-
148, and purchased on the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace created under
the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., for an
individual up to four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty level,
operating in this state shall be subject to §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126 and §
23-99-1128 as of January 1, 2025.
(c) Any state or local governmental employee plan is exempt from §§
23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126 and § 23-99-1128.
(d) A health benefit plan provided by a trust established under §§ 14-
54-101 and 25-20-104 to provide benefits, including accident and health
benefits, death benefits, dental benefits, and disability income benefits, is
exempt from §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126.
(e)(1) Prescription drugs, medicines, biological products,
pharmaceuticals, or pharmaceutical services are exempt as a healthcare
service for purposes of §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126 until December 31, 2024
subject to the gold card program unless exempted from the gold card program
under § 23-99-1128(b).
(2)(A) As of January 1, 2025, the provisions of §§ 23-99-1120 —
23-99-1126 shall apply to prescription drugs, medicines, biological products,
pharmaceuticals, or pharmaceutical services that have not been approved for
continuation of prior authorization under § 23-99-1128.
(B) For the products in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section that have not been approved for continuation of prior authorization,
for purposes of § 23-99-1120, then:
(i) Provisions regarding time periods specified
during calendar year 2022 shall instead apply to the same months during
calendar year 2023; and
(ii) Provisions regarding time periods specified
during calendar year 2024 shall instead apply to the same months during
calendar year 2025.
(f)(1) Upon request, a healthcare insurer or a pharmacy benefits
manager shall send an eligibility file notification to a healthcare provider.
(2) An eligibility file notification under subdivision (f)(1) of
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
this section shall indicate whether a subscriber is enrolled in a:
(A) Health benefit plan that is:
(i) Self-insured under the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-406;
(ii) A fully insured health benefit plan; or
(iii) A self-funded health benefit plan;
(B) Qualified health benefit plan that is a health benefit
plan under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-
148, and purchased on the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace created under
the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., for an
individual up to four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty level,
operating in this state; or
(C) Qualified health benefit plan that is a health benefit
plan under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-
148, and purchased as a health benefit plan under Arkansas Health Insurance
Marketplace created under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, §
23-61-801 et seq., for an individual over four hundred percent (400%) of the
federal poverty level.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1128 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1128. Prescription drugs, medicines, biological products,
pharmaceuticals, or pharmaceutical services.
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2024, a healthcare insurer or pharmacy
benefits manager shall submit a written request to the Arkansas State Board
of Pharmacy for any prescription drug, medicine, biological product,
pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service to be reviewed for a continuation
of prior authorization by a specified health benefit plan whether or not a
healthcare provider has met the criteria for an exemption from prior
authorization under §§ 23-99-1120 — 23-99-1126.
(2) The request under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
state the reason the request is being made for each prescription drug,
medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service for
the specified health benefit plan If a prescription drug, medicine,
biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service is not exempt
from the gold card program under subsection (b) of this section, then a
healthcare provider shall be reviewed by a healthcare insurer or pharmacy
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
benefits manager under the gold card program for the prescription drug,
medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service.
(b)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State
Medical Board, jointly, may establish criteria and procedures to review
whether a request made under subdivision (a)(1) of this section should be
granted for the requesting party and specified health benefit plan For a
prescription drug, medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or
pharmaceutical service to be exempt from the gold card program, a healthcare
insurer or pharmacy benefits manager may submit a written request to the
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy for approval.
(2) A request under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
state the reason the request is being made for each prescription drug,
medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service for
which exemption from the gold card program is requested.
(3) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State
Medical Board, jointly, shall establish criteria and procedures to review
whether a request for exemption from the gold card program made under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section should be granted.
(4) The criteria established under subdivision (b)(3) of this
section shall include criteria related to the cost and the safety of the
prescription drug, medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or
pharmaceutical service.
(5) Under the criteria established and procedures described
under subdivision (b)(3) of this section, the Arkansas State Board of
Pharmacy and the Arkansas State Medical Board, jointly, shall determine
whether to approve a request to exempt a prescription drug, medicine,
biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service from the gold
card program.
(6) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall promptly notify
the entity that made the request of the joint decision made by the Arkansas
State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(7) The decision of the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the
Arkansas State Medical Board, jointly, regarding each prescription drug,
medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service shall
apply to all healthcare insurers or pharmacy benefits managers.
(8) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall post on the
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy's website a list of prescription drugs,
medicines, biological products, pharmaceuticals, or pharmaceutical services
that are exempt from the gold card program.
(9) An approval for exemption from the gold card program is
valid for two (2) years from the date of the notice provided under
subdivision (b)(6) of this section.
(c)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State
Medical Board, jointly, may determine whether or not a prescription drug,
medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service may
be subject to prior authorization by a health benefit plan under the criteria
and procedures under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall promptly notify
the entity that made the request of the joint decision made by the Arkansas
State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(d) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall make available to any
person who requests it, a list for any health benefit plan of prescription
drugs, medicines, biological products, pharmaceuticals, or pharmaceutical
services that require a prior authorization under this section.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1129 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1129. Appeals process for disallowance of prior authorization.
(a) If the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State
Medical Board, jointly, disallow a prior authorization of a prescription
drug, medicine, biological product, pharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical service
requested under § 23-99-1128, a healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits
manager, or other interested party may file an appeal to the State Insurance
Department within ninety (90) days of the disallowance of the prior
authorization.
(b) The healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other
interested party shall provide a notice of seven (7) days to the Arkansas
State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State Medical Board of the
healthcare insurer's, pharmacy benefits manager's, or other interested
party's intent to file an appeal.
(c) No later than the thirtieth day after the date a healthcare
insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other interested party files an appeal
under subsection (a) of this section, the Insurance Commissioner shall
03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 H2/20/25 H3/13/25 HB1301
appoint an independent review organization to review the appeal.
(c)(d) A healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other
interested party that files an appeal under subsection (a) of this section
shall pay for the independent review organization appointed under subsection
(b)(c) of this section to review the appeal.
(e)(1) If a healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other
interested party succeeds in its appeal and overturns the decision of the
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State Medical Board, the
healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other interested party
shall be reimbursed for fifty percent (50%) of the cost remitted to the
independent review organization under subsection (d) of this section.
(2) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy and the Arkansas State
Medical Board shall each provide twenty-five percent (25%) of the total
reimbursement to the healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other
interested party under subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(d)(f) A healthcare insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or other
interested party is bound by the independent review organization's
determination of the appeal under this section.
/s/L. Johnson

















03-13-2025 09:57:51 ANS112